Washington statutes.
RCW 18.51.009

Resident rights.

RCW 70.129.007, 70.129.105, 70.129.150 through 70.129.170, and 70.129.190 apply to this chapter and persons regulated under this chapter.

[ 2021 c 159 s 6; 1994 c 214 s 22.]

NOTES:

Findings—2021 c 159: See note following RCW 18.20.520.

Conflict with federal requirements—1994 c 214: See RCW 70.129.901.